Hawaii statutes.
PART 8.
GENERAL PROVISIONS

CONCERNING
PROBATE AND NONPROBATE TRANSFERS

§560:2-801 REPEALED. L 2000, c 43, §3.

Cross References

Uniform disclaimer of property interests act, see chapter
526.

Previous
Vol12_Ch0501-0588
Next